Utah statutes.
32B-2-208.   Services of State Health Laboratory.

The State Health Laboratory shall make its services available to the department when necessary.  The department shall pay for the services from the Liquor Control Fund to the Department of Health.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

